Wyoming, session 2026, HB0109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi)(B) is amended to
read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

HB0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0296
(xlvi) A portion of a single family residential
structure and the associated improved land as a homeowner
tax exemption as provided in this paragraph. The following
shall apply to this exemption:

(B) As used in this paragraph, "single
family residential structure" means a structure intended
for human habitation including a house, modular home,
mobile home, townhouse or condominium that is a privately
owned single family dwelling unit. Beginning with tax year
2026 and each tax year thereafter, "single family
residential structure" shall mean a single family
residential structure as defined in this subparagraph where
the person claiming the exemption actually resides for not
less than eight (8) months of the year. Beginning with tax
year 2026 and each tax year thereafter, if the person
claiming the exemption or a member of that person's
immediate family is an active duty member of the armed
forces and service in the armed forces is the reason that
the person claiming the exemption cannot meet the eight (8)
month requirement specified in this subparagraph, the
person shall qualify for the exemption if the single family
residential structure is the legal domicile of the
HB0109

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0296
applicable member of the armed forces. The person claiming
the exemption shall submit a claim to the county assessor
not later than the second Monday in May each year in a
manner provided by the department of revenue;

Section 2. This act shall apply to claims for the
property tax exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) for
the tax year beginning January 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0109